Vermont, session 2025-2026, H451.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) Equal opportunity is a fundamental principle of American democracy.
(b) Equal access to economic opportunity and to cultural empowerment are
priorities of the State of Vermont.
(c)(1) Structural racism, defined as the laws, policies, institutional
practices, cultural representations, and other societal norms that often work
together to deny equal opportunity, has resulted in wealth disparities and
cultural disempowerment among Vermonters.
(2) Great social costs arise from these inequities, including threats to
economic development, democracy, and the social health and wellness of the
State of Vermont.
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 2 of 19
(d)(1) Wealth disparities are a function of not only access to income, but
also the ability to have access to the land, to property ownership, and to
cultural preservation and empowerment, which has been impacted by race,
ethnicity, sex, geography, language preference, immigrant or citizen status,
sexual orientation, gender identity, socioeconomic status, and disability status.
(2) Wealth disparities and cultural disempowerment directly and
indirectly affect the health and wellness of individuals and communities.
(e)(1) The foundation of our current economic system was built on land
that was taken from Abenaki and other Indigenous persons, and the structures
of our economic system were constructed with the labor of enslaved persons.
(2) The legacy of settler colonialism and chattel slavery has been
systemic racism and discrimination embedded into many aspects of our
modern way of life on this land.
(3) The relationship between all persons and the land has been used to
oppress persons over the past several centuries.
(4) The laws and policies of our State and nation severed Indigenous
persons from their land while denying them, Black persons, and other persons
of color from having the opportunity to access and own land.
(5) These actions of the State led to systemic racism that has impacted
all Vermonters who have historically suffered from discrimination and who
have not had equal access to public or private economic benefits due to race,
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 3 of 19
ethnicity, sex, geography, language preference, immigrant or citizen status,
sexual orientation, gender identity, socioeconomic status, or disability status.
(6) The actions of the State have led to the erasure or appropriation of
culture for the descendants of slaves and Indigenous persons.
(f)(1) In order to offer repair for the systemic discrimination faced by many
persons throughout the State over the past four centuries, the State of Vermont
must engage in a just transition to an economic system that systemically
undoes racism instead of reinforcing it.
(2) Efforts to remedy wealth disparity in the United States have
traditionally looked to the free market, extractive economy for solutions to the
very problem that it has created.
(3) However, there has been increased recognition that improving access
to economic opportunity and cultural empowerment will require broader
approaches.
(4) In order to rectify this history of inequity, we must create economic
opportunity and cultural empowerment, using new systems that empower and
center Vermonters who have historically suffered from discrimination and who
have not had equal access to public or private economic benefits due to race,
ethnicity, sex, geography, language preference, immigrant or citizen status,
sexual orientation, gender identity, socioeconomic status, or disability status.
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 4 of 19
(g) It is therefore the intent of the General Assembly to acknowledge and
address wealth disparity and cultural disempowerment by creating economic
opportunity and cultural empowerment for Vermonters who have historically
suffered from discrimination and who have not had equal access to public or
private economic benefits due to race, ethnicity, sex, geography, language
preference, immigrant or citizen status, sexual orientation, gender identity,
socioeconomic status, or disability status by ensuring equal access to economic
advancement and cultural reconstruction in the State of Vermont.
(h) In addition to the actions taken by this act, the State must engage in a
deep process of truth and reconciliation, guided by the persons who have been
most impacted, to address the underlying wounds of colonization and slavery.
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Non-White” means Black, Indigenous, and other Persons of Color
(BIPOC). The term is not intended to reflect self-identity but rather how
persons are categorized in the racial caste system on which discrimination has
been historically based in the United States. This term is used in this act
because currently Vermont typically disaggregates data solely by White and
non-White.
(2) “Race and ethnicity” means the categories for classifying individuals
that have been created by prevailing social perceptions, historical policies, and
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 5 of 19
practices. The term includes how individuals perceive themselves and how
individuals are perceived by others.
(b) Wealth disparity in Vermont. Concerning the history of wealth
disparity in Vermont, the General Assembly finds:
(1) History, research, and experience demonstrate that Vermont
residents experience barriers to the equal enjoyment and benefit of economic
opportunity and cultural empowerment based on race and ethnicity.
(2) The United States was founded as a country on a triangular
relationship between settlers, native persons, and slaves.
(3) This structure created an inequity for wealth, economic resources,
cultural empowerment, homeownership, and land access through systemic
oppression and systematic racism for those who were defined as native or
slave.
(4) Prior to Vermont self-declaring its occupation of the land in 1777, it
is estimated that at least 10,000 Indigenous persons were living in the region,
specifically upwards of 4,000 Abenaki living in the Champlain Valley.
(5) Centuries of genocide, eugenics, broken treaties, displacement, and
land dispossession placed persons of the Abenaki Nations and other
Indigenous persons living in Vermont at a great social disadvantage.
(6) Although the original Vermont Constitution abolished slavery in this
State, with two exception clauses, it took until 1854 for African Americans to
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 6 of 19
be considered legally free and not considered as property in the State, and not
until 1863 were African Americans federally recognized as free from
enslavement.
(7) During and since these early days of colonization and slavery, due to
local, State, and federal policies that were intentionally developed to
economically, socially, and racially discriminate against members of the
BIPOC community, multigenerational poverty has created a disturbing
disproportionate wealth gap for land and home ownership in what we now
know as Vermont and the United States.
(8) Federal land policies and programs denied members of the BIPOC
community farmland ownership opportunities that were available to their
White counterparts.
(9) The federal government’s creation of early land use policies, such as
those adopted under President Andrew Johnson, who overturned the infamous
“40 acres and a mule” and implemented “states’ rights” based reconstruction
policies, resulted in sharecropping.
(10) Sharecropping was the federal government prohibiting Black
farmers from owning property, and as a result, they were forced to rent land
from White landlords. Reconstruction policies resulted in sharecropping and
prohibiting Black farmers from owning property, and as a result, they were
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 7 of 19
forced to rent land from White landlords. Many Black farmers at this time
experienced unfair terms and agreements.
(11) The U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) and Farm Service
Agency (FSA) Loan Distribution Program has made it difficult for Black and
other persons of color to own farmland.
(12) In 1910, it was reported that 14 percent of all farm owner operators
in the United States were Black or African American. By 2012, they
comprised only 1.5 percent of farm owners across the country.
(13) Redlining was the practice of denying bank loans for mortgages to
Black and other persons of color, and it was used to segregate Black and other
communities of color into inner city neighborhoods. Redlining has drastically
impacted members of the BIPOC community for generations and has further
withheld generational wealth from the Black communities.
(14) The Housing and Urban Development’s Home Owners’ Loan
Corporation (HOLC) program denied Black and brown residents’ equal access
to home mortgages, often offering subprime loans that came with unusually
severe terms.
(15) Funds from the GI Bill intended to insure private mortgages, reduce
down payments, and cover tuition were only made available to White veterans,
denying BIPOC veterans access to wealth, land, and home ownership thus
denying them access to the economic opportunity of generational wealth.
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 8 of 19
(16) Despite amendments to the U.S. Constitution and the 1866 Civil
Rights Act, systemic racism, within both Vermont’s housing and agricultural
sectors, remains prevalent today.
(17) On July 16, 2020, Burlington, Vermont, took the bold move to
declare racism as a public health emergency, citing that only four percent of
the homes owned in Burlington were owned by persons of color while making
up 18 percent of the population and that they were four and a half times as
likely to be denied for a home loan compared to applicants who are White.
(18) Housing disparity and land access may increase with COVID-19,
advancing the triple threats of oppression—racism, classism, and sexism—in
the State.
(19) Without adequate access to land and home ownership, BIPOC are
forced to live in multigenerational housing, placing them at higher risk to
COVID-19 exposure.
(20) Nearly a quarter of Black Vermonters live in poverty, compared
with 11 percent of Vermonters overall. However, poverty rates for the BIPOC
community exceeded the State average in 2018. Poverty rates were also
greater among persons who include themselves in two or more racial groups or
identified as American Indian or of Hispanic or Latino origin.
(c) Concerning the connection among health, wealth, and property
ownership, the General Assembly finds:
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 9 of 19
(1) Food insecurity rates are higher for members of the BIPOC
community who reside in the State of Vermont than their White neighbors.
(2) During the COVID-19 pandemic, it was estimated by the University
of Vermont that 49 percent of BIPOC households in the State experienced food
insecurity compared to 25.2 percent of White households. Food insecurity has
been linked to and known to cause mental health problems and depression,
hypertension and hyperlipidemia, worse outcomes on health exams, being in
poor or fair health, poor sleep, and obesity.
(3) According to the 2018 Vermont Department of Health’s Behavioral
Risk Factor Surveillance System report, non-White Vermonters are:
(A) statistically less likely to have a personal doctor;
(B) statistically more likely to report poor mental health;
(C) more than twice as likely to report rarely or never getting the
emotional and social support they need;
(D) significantly more likely to have depression;
(E) significantly more likely to have been worried about having
enough food in the past year; and
(F) significantly more likely to report no leisure-time physical
activity.
(4) The average age is 33 for BIPOC Vermonters, versus 46 for
Vermonters who are White.
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 10 of 19
(5) BIPOC Vermonters are at a higher risk for more serious health
outcomes, such as hospitalization.
(6) Although there are not statistically significant differences in the rates
of pre-existing conditions, including diabetes, lung disease, and cardiovascular
disease, among all Vermonters, there are disparities in rates of pre-existing
conditions among COVID-19 cases. The pre-existing conditions rate among
COVID-19 cases is 19.4 for BIPOC Vermonters.
(7)(A) Property ownership rates for the BIPOC community in the State
continue to remain stagnant.
(B) In a 2019 equity report, Burlington city officials found that
BIPOC own only four percent of the homes there, though they make up
18 percent of the city’s population.
(C) Furthermore, Black Burlingtonians are four times as likely to be
denied for a home loan as a White counterpart.
(D) This is a direct result of the wealth gap between the BIPOC
community and their White counterparts.
(8) The median household income for a Black Vermonter is $41,533.00
compared to $58,244.00 for their White counterparts.
(9) Nearly 24 percent of Black Vermonters live in poverty compared to
nearly 11 percent of White Vermonters.
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 11 of 19
Sec. 3. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to invest in systems of economic advancement
and cultural empowerment as a way to move towards greater racial and social
equity in wealth distribution, health, resilience, and economic and cultural
prosperity.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 3 is amended to read:
§ 3. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT; PRINCIPLES; REVIEW AND
ASSESSMENT
(a) For purposes of the Vermont Statutes Annotated and State economic
development programs and assistance, “economic development” means the
process of generating economic wealth and vitality, security, and opportunity
for all Vermonters.
(b) There are established the following four five interrelated principles for
future economic development in Vermont:
(1) Vermont’s businesses, educators, nongovernmental organizations,
and government form a collaborative partnership that results in a highly skilled
multigenerational workforce to support and enhance business vitality and
individual prosperity.
(2) Vermont invests in its digital, physical, and human infrastructure as
the foundation for all economic development.
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 12 of 19
(3) Vermont State government takes advantage of its small scale to
create nimble, efficient, and effective policies and regulations that support
business growth and the economic prosperity of all Vermonters.
(4) Vermont leverages its brand and scale to encourage a diverse
economy that reflects and capitalizes on our rural character, entrepreneurial
people, and reputation for environmental quality.
(5) Vermont embraces its responsibility to course correct the historical
impact of economic exploitation and exclusion from opportunity due to race
and ethnicity for American descendants of slavery and the broader Black,
Indigenous, and other Persons of Color community.
(c) The four five principles shall be used to guide the design and
implementation of each economic development program, policy, or initiative
that is sponsored or financially supported by the State, its subdivisions,
agencies, authorities, or private partners.
* * *
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 3902 is amended to read:
§ 3902. OFFICE OF ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
(a) The Director of the Office of Economic Opportunity is hereby
authorized to allocate available financial assistance for community services
agencies and programs in accordance with State and federal law and
regulation.
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 13 of 19
(b) The Director may provide financial assistance to community services
agencies for the planning, conduct, administration and evaluation of
community service programs to provide a range of services and activities
having a measurable and potentially major impact on causes of poverty in the
community or in areas of the community where poverty is a particularly acute
problem. Components of those services and activities may involve, without
limitation of other activities and supporting facilities designed to assist low
income participants with low income:
(1) to secure and retain meaningful employment;
(2) to obtain adequate education;
(3) to make better use of available income;
(4) to provide and maintain adequate housing and a suitable living
environment;
(5) to obtain services for the prevention of narcotics addiction,
alcoholism, and for the rehabilitation of narcotic addicts and alcoholics;
(6) to obtain emergency assistance through loans and grants to meet
immediate and urgent individual and family needs, including the need for
health services, nutritious food, housing, and unemployment-related assistance;
(7) to remove obstacles and solve personal and family problems which
that block achievement of self-sufficiency;
(8) to achieve greater participation in the affairs of the community;
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 14 of 19
(9) to make more frequent and effective use of other programs related to
the purposes of this chapter;
(10) to coordinate and establish linkages between governmental and
other social service programs to assure ensure the effective delivery of such
services to low-income persons with low income; and to encourage the use of
entities in the private sector of the community in efforts to ameliorate poverty
in the community; and
(11) to correct the historical impact of economic exploitation and
exclusion from opportunity due to race and ethnicity of American descendants
of slavery and the broader Black, Indigenous, and other Persons of Color
community.
(c) The Director is authorized to adopt rules pursuant to chapter 25 of this
title appropriate to the carrying out of this chapter and the purposes thereof.
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 2471e is added to read:
§ 2471e. DEPARTMENT OF CULTURAL EMPOWERMENT AND
ECONOMIC ADVANCEMENT
(a) The Vermont Department of Cultural Empowerment and Economic
Advancement is created within the Agency of Commerce and Community
Development.
(b) The Department shall work to ensure programing implementation
through the statewide Cultural Empowerment and Economic Advancement
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 15 of 19
(CEEA) Network, which shall consist of four Community Empowerment
Centers located in different geographic regions of the State.
(c) There is created a special fund in the State Treasury named the Vermont
Department of Cultural Empowerment and Economic Advancement Grant
Fund.
(d) Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7,
subchapter 5:
(1) The Department shall administer the Fund.
(2) The Fund shall comprise monies appropriated to it by the General
Assembly and other public or private monies the Board accepts.
(3) Unexpended balances and any earnings shall remain in the Fund
from year to year.
(e) The Department shall use monies in the Fund to design and implement
a grant program for qualified organizations and collaboratives led by Black,
Indigenous, and other Persons of Color (BIPOC) that provides grants to
support programming throughout the CEEA Network.
(f) The Department shall provide grants to:
(1) provide cultural empowerment programming to:
(A) educate on the true history, contributions, and resilience of
American Descendants of Slavery (ADOS) and other Black, Indigenous, and
other Persons of Color;
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 16 of 19
(B) serve as a resource, facilitate, and assist in the implementation of
ADOS cultural commemorations and celebrations;
(C) facilitate various additional cultural activities; and
(D) serve as a central hub for access, cultivation, creation, and
curation of cultural arts;
(2) establish the Business Cultivation and Support Program, including:
(A) small business technical assistance;
(B) small business grants and loans;
(C) small business-to-business mentorship program;
(D) technical assistance; and
(E) small business procurement contract assistance;
(3) coordinate personal and professional development, including:
(A) adult basic education;
(B) career development; and
(C) personal and career coaching; and
(4) deliver wealth development and management planning, consisting
of:
(A) financial management;
(B) home and land ownership; and
(C) investment management.
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 17 of 19
Sec. 7. APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2026, the amount of $10,000,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Vermont Department of Cultural Empowerment and
Economic Advancement Grant Fund for grants and other expenditures
approved by the Department of Cultural Empowerment and Economic
Advancement.
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 2 is added to read:
§ 2. RACIAL AND SOCIAL EQUITY IN BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
The Department of Economic Development, in collaboration with the
Vermont Economic Development Authority, the Vermont Center for Emerging
Technologies, the Vermont Small Business Development Center, and other
relevant stakeholders, shall design and implement the BIPOC Business
Development Program, the purposes of which are to:
(1) increase the number of, and provide support to, BIPOC business
start-ups;
(2) provide BIPOC-owned businesses with broader access to capital;
and
(3) provide BIPOC-owned businesses with technical assistance.
Sec. 9. 3 V.S.A. § 2222e is added to read:
§ 2222e. RACIAL AND SOCIAL EQUITY IN BUSINESS
PROCUREMENT PROGRAM
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 18 of 19
The Secretary of Administration shall design and implement the BIPOC
Business Procurement Program for all agencies and departments within State
government, the purposes of which are to:
(1) increase State government outreach to BIPOC-owned businesses for
participation in bidding for government procurement contracts;
(2) provide technical and other assistance to BIPOC-owned businesses
that seek to participate in the government procurement process; and
(3) establish a minimum percentage of State procurement contracts or
funding that is awarded to BIPOC-owned businesses.
Sec. 10. 3 V.S.A. § 2222 is amended to read:
§ 2222. POWERS AND DUTIES; BUDGET AND REPORT
* * *
(g) The Secretary of Administration, in consultation with the Racial Equity
Director, shall adopt rules that require each agency and department in this State
to implement policies and procedures designed to create pathways for career
advancement for current and future employees who are members of BIPOC
communities in this State.
* * *
VT LEG #380683 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.451
2025 Page 19 of 19
Sec. 11. 21 V.S.A. § 1126 is added to read:
§ 1126. RACIAL AND SOCIAL EQUITY IN CONTINUING EDUCATION
AND APPRENTICESHIP
The Department of Labor, in collaboration with the Vermont State Colleges
and the Vermont Training Program within the Agency of Commerce and
Community Development, shall design and implement five continuing
education and apprenticeship programs for members of BIPOC communities in
this State.
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380683 v.1